apertium-yaq.yaq.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ’
 
!!! Archiphonemes for Reduplication !!!
%{OREDUP1%}:0
%{OREDUP2%}:0
%{OREDUP3%}:0
%{VREDUP%}:0
%{OOREDUP4%}:0
%{OOREDUP5%}:0
%{OOREDUP6%}:0
%{CREDUP%}:0
%{GREDUP%}:0

!!! Archiphonemes for Suffixation !!!

 %{T%}:t ! All nouns ending with t must end with %{T%}
 %{CH%}:0 ! Part of -im suffix
 %{I%}:0 ! Part of -im suffix

 %{V%}:0 ! The changing vowel of the past tense suffix on nouns

 %{K%}:k ! Archiphoneme for past tense on verbs
 %{AN%}:0 ! Archiphoneme for past tense on verbs

 %{K0%}:k ! Locative suffix; 0 after k

 !!! Archiphonemes for Vowel Change !!!

 %{EU%}:e
 %{EO%}:e
 %{AU%}:a
 %{E%}:e ! archiphoneme after V', as in bwa'e



 !!! Miscellaneous Archiphonemes !!!

  %{LR%}:l %{LR%}:r ! l is affectionate; r derogatory

 %{BLOCK%}:0 ! Blocks other twol operation:0 ! 

 %>:0  ;
 
Sets

Vowel = A E I O U
        a e i o u ;
        
Consonant = B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Y Z
            b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;
            
ArchConsonant = %{T%} ; 

Pseudovowel = A E I O U W H 
              a e i o u w h ;

Rules 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Reduplication Rules !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!! Reduplicate Open Syllable !!!

 "Copy first consonant"
 %{OREDUP1%}:Cx <=> _ [ %{OREDUP2%}: %{OREDUP3%}: ( %{CREDUP%}: ) [ Cx:Cx ] ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;
               where Cx in Consonant ;

 "Copy pseudovowel"
 %{OREDUP2%}:PVx <=> _ [ %{OREDUP3%}: ( %{CREDUP%}: ) [ Consonant:Consonant ] [ PVx:PVx ] ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;
               where PVx in Pseudovowel ;

 "Copy vowel"
 %{OREDUP3%}:Vx <=> _ [ ( %{CREDUP%}: ) [ Consonant:Consonant ] [ Pseudovowel:Pseudovowel ] [ Vx:Vx ] ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;
               where Vx in Vowel ;

! Note: the reduplication rules here cannot handle reduplication of vowel-initial roots. These are sufficiently rare that they will be handled manually, as they would greatly increase the complexity of the reduplication system.
               
!!! Reduplicate Closed Syllable !!!

! Reduplicate open syllable rules apply from above

 "Copy final consonant"
 %{CREDUP%}:Cx <=> _ [ Consonant:Consonant ( Pseudovowel:Pseudovowel ) [ Vowel:Vowel ] Cx:Cx ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;
              where Cx in Consonant ;

!!! Reduplicate Two Open Syllables !!!

! Reduplicate open syllable rules apply from above for first open syllable

! "Copy first consonant of second syllable"
!%{OOREDUP4%}:Cx <=> _ [ %{OOREDUP5%}: %{OOREDUP6%}: [ Consonant:Consonant ] [ Pseudovowel:Pseudovowel ] ( Vowel:Vowel ) [ Cx:Cx ] ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;
!                where Cx in Consonant ;
                
!"Copy second pseudovowel"
!%{OOREDUP5%}:PVx <=> _ [ %{OOREDUP6%}: [ Consonant:Consonant ]  [ Pseudovowel:Pseudovowel ] ( :Vowel ) [ Consonant:Consonant] [ PVx:PVx ] ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;
!                 where PVx in Pseudovowel ;

!"Copy second vowel"
!%{OOREDUP6%}:Vx <=> _ [ :Consonant :Pseudovowel ( :Vowel ) :Consonant :Pseudovowel :Vx ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;
!                where Vx in Vowel ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Suffixational Morphology !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
            
!!! Plural Marker -im (%{CH%}%{I%}m) !!!

"Make word-final t into c when followed by -im"
%{T%}:c <=> _ [ %{CH%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;

"Make {CH} into h when preceded by t"
%{CH%}:h <=> [ %{T%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;

"Make {I} into i when preceded by consonant"
%{I%}:i <=> [ :Consonant %{CH%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ; 

!"Make {I} into i when preceded by ArchConsonant"
!%{I%}:i <=> [ ArchConsonant: %{CH%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;

!!! Tense Marker -kan (%{V%}kan) !!!

"Make {V} into a after i"
%{V%}:a <=> [ :i  ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;
     except [ :Vowel :i ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;

"Make {V} into i after a"
%{V%}:i <=> [ :a  ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;
     except [ :Vowel :a ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;

"Make {V} into e after o"
%{V%}:e <=> [ :o  ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;
     except [ :Vowel :o ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;

"Make {V} into e after u"
%{V%}:e <=> [ :u  ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;
     except [ :Vowel :u ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;

!!! Tense marker -k or -an (%{K%}%{AN%}) !!!

"Make {K} into a after k"
%{K%}:a <=> [ :k ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;

"Make {AN} into n after k"
%{AN%}:n <=> [ :k %{K%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ; 

"Make {EU} into u before suffix"
%{EU%}:u <=> _ [ %{K%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;

"Make {AU} into u before suffix"
%{AU%}:u <=> _ [ %{K%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;

"Make {EO} into o before suffix"
%{EO%}:o <=> _ [ %{K%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;

"Make {E} into previous vowel before suffix"
%{E%}:Vo <=> [ :Vo :’ ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ [ %{K%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* ;
           where Vo in Vowel ;

"Make {AN} into a after {E}"
%{AN%}:a <=> [ %{E%}: %{K%}: ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ; 

!!! Locative -ku !!!

"Make {K0} into 0 after k"
%{K0%}:0 <=> [ :k ]/[ %>:0 ]* _ ;

! Resources
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
